California, session 20252026, AB1344.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 18210) is added to Division 3.2 of Title 2 of Part 6 of the Penal Code, to read: CHAPTER 6. Gun Violence Restraining Order Pilot Project18210. The Legislature finds and declares that it is the intent of this chapter that, in the counties described in this chapter, the district attorney, any assistant district attorney, or any deputy district attorney may petition for a gun violence restraining order in accordance with the same laws and procedures governing the eligibility to petition for a gun violence restraining order pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 18150) or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18170) of this division.18215. (a) The following counties may establish, until January 1, 2032, a pilot program to authorize a district attorney to file a petition for a gun violence restraining order issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 18150) or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18170) of this division:(1) County of Alameda.(2) County of El Dorado.(3) County of Santa Clara.(4) County of Ventura.(b) (1) As used in Section 18109, 18150, 18170, or 18190, “law enforcement officer” includes any district attorney, assistant district attorney, or deputy district attorney for a county identified in subdivision (a) that has established a pilot program pursuant to this section.(2) As used in Section 18109, “law enforcement agency” includes the district attorney’s office for a county identified in subdivision (a) that has established a pilot program pursuant to this section.18220. (a) The district attorney of a county that establishes a pilot program pursuant to this chapter shall, commencing April 1, 2027, annually submit data regarding the pilot program to the California Firearm Violence Research Center at UC Davis. The data submitted shall include all of the following:(1) The number of petitions filed and the outcome of the petitions, if any.(2) Demographic data for the restrained individuals.(3) The reasons that the petition was filed.(4) Areas of success and areas for improvement in subsequent years.(b) (1) The center may conduct an evaluation of a pilot program’s impact and effectiveness. If the center conducts an evaluation of a pilot project, the evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, the data described in subdivision (a).(2) The center may, commencing on or before July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, submit an evaluation described in paragraph (1) to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Public Safety.(c) If the center conducts an evaluation of more than one pilot program pursuant to subdivision (b), the center may combine the evaluations into a comprehensive report and may submit the report, commencing on or before July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Public Safety.(d) The district attorney of a county that establishes a pilot program pursuant to this chapter shall, commencing April 1, 2027, make the data described in subdivision (a) available upon request to the Department of Justice and the Judicial Council.18225. This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2034, deletes or extends that date.SEC. 2. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.